Hawaii statutes.
§196D-13 Exemptions from certain state
laws. In order to promote the purposes of this chapter, all persons hired
by the department to effectuate this chapter are excepted from chapters 76 and
89. [L 1988, c 301, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 148, §18]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next